Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201768-978
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act:

(1) Advanced life support means special services designed to provide definitive prehospital emergency medical care, including, but not limited to, cardiopulmonary resuscitation, cardiac monitoring, cardiac defibrillation, advanced airway management, intravenous therapy, administration with drugs and other medicinal preparations, and other specified techniques and procedures;

(2) Basic life support means emergency first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation procedures to maintain life without invasive techniques;

(3) Capitation payment means a payment the state makes periodically to a contractor on behalf of each beneficiary enrolled under a contract and based on the actuarially sound capitation rate for the provision of services under the state plan and which the state makes regardless of whether the particular beneficiary receives services during the period covered by the payment;

(4) Dry run means ground emergency medical transport services provided by an eligible ground emergency medical transport services provider to an individual who is released on the scene without transportation by ambulance to a medical facility;

(5) Ground emergency medical transport means the act of transporting an individual from any point of origin to the nearest medical facility capable of meeting the emergency medical needs of the patient, including dry runs;

(6) Ground emergency medical transport services means advanced life support, limited advanced life support, and basic life support services provided to an individual by ground emergency medical transport services providers before or during ground emergency medical transport;

(7) Limited advanced life support means special services to provide prehospital emergency medical care limited to techniques and procedures that exceed basic life support but are less than advanced life support services; and

(8) Medical transport means transportation to secure medical examinations and treatment for an individual.

Laws 2017, LB578, § 3.